Washington statutes.
RCW 10.109.020

Ordinance or resolution—Community involvement process.

For a city or town that is not deploying body worn cameras on June 9, 2016, a legislative authority of a city or town is strongly encouraged to adopt an ordinance or resolution authorizing the use of body worn cameras prior to their use by law enforcement or a corrections agency. Any ordinance or resolution authorizing the use of body worn cameras should identify a community involvement process for providing input into the development of operational policies governing the use of body worn cameras.

[ 2016 c 163 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2016 c 163: See note following RCW 42.56.240.